Missouri, session 2026, SB1181.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 570 and 589, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto seven new sections, to be known as sections
570.097, 589.220, 589.222, 589.224, 589.225, 589.226, and
589.227, to read as follows:
570.097. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Motor vehicle key programming or emulating
device", any device, computer program, application, or
software designed or used to electronically communicate with
a motor vehicle for the purpose of programming or emulating
a motor vehicle key fob that is capable of being used to
unlock or start the motor vehicle;
(2) "Relay attack device", any device, computer
program, application, or software designed or used to
intercept the signal from the key fob of a motor vehicle to
unlock or start the motor vehicle.
2. Except as provided in subsection 3 of this section,
no person shall knowingly manufacture, sell, offer to sell,
transfer, or possess a motor vehicle key programming or
emulating device or a relay attack device, or aid or permit

SB 1181 2
another to use a motor vehicle key programming or emulating
device or relay attack device.
3. This section shall not apply to the manufacturing,
sale, offering to sell, transfer, possession, or use of a
motor vehicle key programming or emulating device or relay
attack device for a lawful and reasonable purpose by or to:
(1) A law enforcement officer;
(2) An employee of the National Insurance Crime
Bureau; or
(3) An employee of any licensed dealer, distributor,
or manufacturer of motor vehicles or motor vehicle locks;
motor vehicle mechanic shop; locksmith company; or
repossession agency.
4. Any person authorized to possess a motor vehicle
key programming or emulating device or relay attack device
shall report a lost or stolen device within forty-eight
hours of becoming aware the device was lost or stolen to a
law enforcement agency within the jurisdiction in which the
device is known or thought to be lost or stolen.
5. Any person convicted of a violation of subsection 2
of this section shall be guilty of a class D felony.
6. Any person who fails to report a lost or stolen
device as required under subsection 4 of this section shall
be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
7. The provisions of this section are severable. If
any section or provision of this section is declared invalid
or unconstitutional, the remainder of this section shall
remain in force.
589.220. Sections 589.220 to 589.226 shall be known
and may be cited as the "Motor Vehicle Theft Prevention
Commission Act".

SB 1181 3
589.222. 1. There is hereby created within the
department of public safety the "Motor Vehicle Theft
Prevention Program". Under the program, law enforcement
agencies or other qualified applicants may apply for grants
to assist in improving and supporting motor vehicle theft
prevention programs or programs for the enforcement of
prosecution of motor vehicle theft crimes through statewide
planning and coordination.
2. Matters relating to the supervision, authority, and
control over the motor vehicle theft prevention program
shall be at the discretion of the "Motor Vehicle Theft
Prevention Commission", which is hereby established. Any
allocation of moneys by the commission under sections
589.220 to 589.227, including grants awarded under section
589.224, shall receive approval from the director of the
department of public safety prior to any such allocation.
3. The commission shall consist of twelve members,
composed of the following:
(1) The superintendent of the Missouri state highway
patrol or his or her designee;
(2) The director of the department of commerce and
insurance or his or her designee;
(3) The director of the department of revenue or his
or her designee;
(4) The attorney general or his or her designee;
(5) The following persons, appointed by the governor:
(a) A county sheriff;
(b) A municipal police chief;
(c) A county prosecuting attorney;
(d) A representative from a motor vehicle manufacturer
doing business in Missouri;

SB 1181 4
(e) A representative from an insurance company
authorized to issue motor vehicle coverage in Missouri;
(f) A representative from the motor vehicle rental
industry;
(g) A licensed new or used motor vehicle dealer; and
(h) A representative from the National Insurance Crime
Bureau.
4. The commission shall elect annually from its
membership a chair and a vice chair. A quorum shall consist
of a majority of appointed members, but not less than seven
members, and may be met by electronic attendance.
5. The term of office for each member of the
commission who is appointed by the governor shall be four
years, except that of the initial appointments, three
members shall be appointed for a term of two years and four
members shall be appointed for a term of four years. Any
member appointed by the governor may be removed from office
by the governor without cause. Before the expiration of the
term of a member appointed by the governor, the governor
shall appoint a successor whose term begins on July first
next following. A member is eligible for reappointment. If
there is a vacancy for any cause, the governor shall make an
appointment to become effective immediately for the
unexpired term.
6. (1) The state highway patrol shall provide to the
commission all administration, management, and organization
of the commission's activities and grant programs. Subject
to available moneys, the commission may appoint a director,
who may employ such staff as may be necessary to operate and
administer the program.

SB 1181 5
(2) No more than eight percent of the moneys in the
fund created under section 589.226 shall be used for
operational or administrative expenses of the program.
(3) The FTE authorization for any staff necessary to
support the program shall be eliminated if sufficient moneys
from gifts, grants, or donations are no longer available for
the program.
7. Members of the commission shall serve without
compensation, except that they shall be reimbursed for their
reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties.
589.224. 1. The commission shall:
(1) Establish a grant program for the provision of
funds to local law enforcement agencies and multi-
jurisdiction task forces for the following:
(a) Prevention, reduction, and investigation of motor
vehicle and motor vehicle parts theft;
(b) Prevention, reduction, and investigation of motor
vehicle-related crime;
(c) Establishment of multi-jurisdiction task forces
upon request of local law enforcement agencies;
(d) Investigation of fraud related to motor vehicle
insurance, motor vehicle dealer purchases, and motor vehicle
rental transactions, and other forms of financial fraud
relating to motor vehicles;
(e) Hiring of personnel by local law enforcement
agencies for the purpose of preventing, reducing, and
investigating motor vehicle-related crime;
(f) Purchase of equipment and technology for support
in motor vehicle-related crime prevention, reduction, and
investigation;

SB 1181 6
(g) Provision of training to local law enforcement
agencies and multi-jurisdiction task forces relative to
motor vehicle-related crime prevention, reduction, and
investigation; and
(h) Production of public awareness materials and
programs relating to motor vehicle-related crime prevention.
(2) Promote statewide planning and coordination of the
investigation and prosecution of crimes relating to motor
vehicle and motor vehicle parts theft;
(3) Provide support to local prosecutors handling
motor vehicle and motor vehicle parts theft-related
prosecutions; and
(4) Provide support to multi-jurisdiction task forces
established by local law enforcement agencies for the
purpose of preventing, reducing, and investigating motor
vehicle-related crime.
2. The commission shall solicit and review
applications for grants under this section. The commission
may award grants for one to three years. The commission
shall give priority to applications representing
multijurisdictional programs. Each grant application, at a
minimum, shall describe the type of motor vehicle-related
crime prevention, reduction, investigation, enforcement,
prosecution, or offender rehabilitation program to be
implemented. Such programs may include, but shall not be
limited to:
(1) Multi-jurisdiction task forces and programs
utilizing the National Insurance Crime Bureau task force
that reduce motor vehicle-related crime and increase the
apprehension of motor vehicle and motor vehicle parts
thieves and persons who attempt to defraud insurance
companies;

SB 1181 7
(2) Motor vehicle-related crime prevention efforts,
activities, and public awareness campaigns intended to
reduce victimization by motor vehicle-related crime and
fraud;
(3) The provision of specialized training for motor
vehicle-related crime investigation personnel including, but
not limited to, law enforcement personnel, local motor
vehicle registration agents and title clerks, and port
facility employees, in order to enhance knowledge, skills,
procedures, and systems to detect, prevent, and combat motor
vehicle-related crime and fraud;
(4) The provision of support and maintenance by one or
more dedicated prosecutors who have the specific mission and
expertise to provide legal guidance and prosecutorial
continuity to complex criminal cases arising from the
activities of a multi-jurisdiction task force; and
(5) The prevention of future criminal behavior by
first-time offenders who have been charged, convicted, or
adjudicated for a motor vehicle-related crime.
3. Subject to available moneys, the commission shall
approve grants under this section. To the extent possible,
grants awarded under this section shall be awarded to local
law enforcement agencies, multi-jurisdiction task forces, or
other qualified applicants in a variety of geographic areas
of the state. The ability to contribute additional moneys
or match funding for a program shall not be required as a
condition of receipt of a grant under this section.
589.225. 1. The executive director of the department
of public safety shall promulgate rules for the
administration of sections 589.220 to 589.227, including,
but not limited to:

SB 1181 8
(1) Requirements for an entity other than a law
enforcement agency to be a qualified applicant;
(2) Application procedures by which law enforcement
agencies or other qualified applicants may apply for grants
pursuant to the grant program established under section
589.224;
(3) The criteria for selecting those agencies or other
qualified applicants that shall receive grants, and the
criteria for determining the amount to be granted to the
selected agencies or applicants, and the duration of the
grants; and
(4) Procedures for reviewing the success of the
programs that receive grants.
2. On or before December 1, 2027, any law enforcement
agency or other qualified applicant that receives a grant
pursuant to section 589.224 shall submit a report to the
commission concerning the implementation of the program
funded through the grant.
3. On or before February 1, 2028, the commission shall
report to the judiciary committees of the senate and the
house of representatives on the implementation of the
programs receiving grants pursuant to this section. The
report shall include, but shall not be limited to:
(1) The number and geographic jurisdiction of law
enforcement agencies or other qualified applicants that
received grants under this section and the amount and
duration of the grants;
(2) The effect that the programs that received grants
had on the number of motor vehicle thefts in those areas of
the state;

SB 1181 9
(3) Recommendations for legislative changes to assist
in the prevention, enforcement, and prosecution of motor
vehicle-theft-related criminal activities; and
(4) Recommendations for changes in state programs,
policies, budgets, and standards relating to improving and
supporting the motor-vehicle-related crime prevention
initiatives of local law enforcement agencies and
multijurisdictional task forces.
589.226. 1. There is hereby created in the state
treasury the "Motor Vehicle Theft Prevention Commission
Revolving Fund", which shall consist of moneys appropriated
to it by the general assembly.
2. The commission may accept and use federal funds
granted by Congress or by Executive Order, as well as gifts
and donations from individuals, private organizations, or
foundations. The acceptance and use of federal funds shall
not require state matching funds nor shall such acceptance
place an obligation on the general assembly to continue the
purposes for which the federal funds are made available.
3. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund.
In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state
treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a
dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in this fund
shall be used solely as provided in sections 589.220 to
589.226. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund. The state treasurer shall invest
moneys in the fund in the same manner as other funds are
invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such
investments shall be credited to the fund.

SB 1181 10
589.227. Pursuant to section 23.253 of the Missouri
sunset act:
(1) The program authorized pursuant to sections
589.220 to 589.227 shall automatically sunset six years
after the effective date of sections 589.220 to 589.227
unless reauthorized by an act of the general assembly;
(2) Sections 589.220 to 589.227 shall terminate on
September first of the calendar year immediately following
the calendar year in which the program authorized pursuant
to sections 589.220 to 589.227 is sunset; and
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall not be
construed to impair or impede the state's fulfillment of any
obligations, including the authorization, issuance, or
redemption of tax credits, incurred pursuant to sections
589.220 to 589.227 prior to the date the program authorized
pursuant to sections 589.220 to 589.227 is sunset.
✓